District of Columbia statutes.
3-1205.09

Scope of license, registration, or certification.

(a)

(1)

A person licensed, registered, or certified under this chapter to practice a health occupation is authorized to practice that occupation in the District while the license, registration, or certification is effective.

(2)

A person certified to practice advanced registered nursing is authorized to practice the specialty for which he or she has been certified by the Board of Nursing.

(b)

An individual who fails to renew a license, registration, or certification to practice a health occupation shall be considered to be unlicensed, unregistered, or uncertified and subject to the penalties set forth in this chapter and other applicable laws of the District, if he or she continues to practice the health occupation.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 509, 33 DCR 729
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(e)(10), 56 DCR 4043
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 30(a), 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 2-3305.9.
D.C. Law 18-26 rewrote the section.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(a)(2) which did not affect this section as codified.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e)(10) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).